New York, session 2025-2026, A7686.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "public renewables transparency act". 3 § 2. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 27-a of section 1005 of the public 4 authorities law is amended by adding two new subparagraphs (xi) and 5 (xii) to read as follows: 6 (xi) During at least three board of trustees' meetings per year, there 7 shall be a public report delivered and published on the development and 8 implementation of the authority's renewable energy generation strategic 9 plan. A statement explaining that there is no update shall be accepta- 10 ble. 11 (xii) The authority shall maintain a public dashboard on their website 12 demonstrating their progress in implementing the authority's renewable 13 energy generation strategic plan. 14 § 3. Subparagraph (vii) of paragraph (e) of subdivision 27-a of 15 section 1005 of the public authorities law, as added by section 1 of 16 part QQ of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 (vii) The authority shall post a draft of the strategic plan on its 19 website for public comment for a period of at least sixty days, and 20 shall hold at least three public hearings on the draft strategic plan in 21 regionally diverse parts of the state. Consideration should be given to 22 the availability of public transit when selecting locations for in-per- 23 son hearings. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00523-08-5 A. 7686--A 2 1 § 4. Section 6-102 of the energy law, as added by chapter 433 of the 2 laws of 2009, subdivisions 1, 2 and 3 as amended by chapter 195 of the 3 laws of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 6-102. State energy planning board. 1. There shall be established a 5 state energy planning board, hereinafter referred to as the "board", 6 which shall consist of the chair of the public service commission, the 7 commissioner of environmental conservation, the chief executive officer 8 of the New York power authority, the commissioner of economic develop- 9 ment, the commissioner of transportation, the commissioner of labor, the 10 commissioner of the division of homeland security and emergency 11 services, the commissioner of agriculture and markets, the commissioner 12 of health, the secretary of state and the president of the New York 13 state energy research and development authority. The governor, the 14 speaker of the assembly and the temporary president of the senate shall 15 each appoint one additional representative to serve on the board. The 16 presiding officer of the federally designated electric bulk system oper- 17 ator (BSO) shall serve as a non-voting member of the board. Any decision 18 or action by the board shall be by majority vote. The president of the 19 New York state energy research and development authority shall serve as 20 chair of the board. Members of the board may designate an executive 21 staff representative to participate on the board on their behalf. 22 2. Regional planning councils shall be established. Two regions shall 23 be established as follows: 24 (a) Downstate region - New York City and Dutchess, Nassau, Orange, 25 Putnam, Rockland, Suffolk, Ulster and Westchester counties; 26 (b) Upstate region - Albany, Allegany, Broome, Cattaraugus, Cayuga, 27 Chautauqua, Chemung, Chenango, Clinton, Columbia, Cortland, Delaware, 28 Erie, Essex, Franklin, Fulton, Genesee, Greene, Hamilton, Herkimer, 29 Jefferson, Lewis, Livingston, Madison, Monroe, Montgomery, Niagara, 30 Oneida, Onondaga, Ontario, Orleans, Oswego, Otsego, Rensselaer, Sarato- 31 ga, Schenectady, Schoharie, Schuyler, Seneca, St. Lawrence, Steuben, 32 Sullivan, Tioga, Tompkins, Warren, Washington, Wayne, Wyoming and Yates 33 counties. 34 The governor, temporary president of the senate and the speaker of the 35 assembly shall each appoint three regional planning council members per 36 region. Regional planning council members shall serve without compen- 37 sation, and shall have their principal residence within the region for 38 which they are appointed. Such regional council members may solicit 39 input from stakeholder interests within their region, including but not 40 limited to local governments, municipal utilities, rural electric coop- 41 eratives, utilities, labor unions, ratepayers, businesses, trade associ- 42 ations, generators, and community organizations. Each regional planning 43 council shall transmit to the board a report containing any recommenda- 44 tions specific to its region on a schedule determined by the board to be 45 appropriate for consideration of such report in the development of the 46 draft energy plan. 47 3. Staff services shall be performed by personnel of the department of 48 public service, the department of environmental conservation, the New 49 York power authority, the department of transportation, the department 50 of economic development, the division of homeland security and emergency 51 services and the New York state energy research and development authori- 52 ty, as directed by the board. Assistance shall also be made available, 53 as requested by the board, from other agencies, departments and public 54 authorities of the state. The board may provide for its own represen- 55 tation in all actions or proceedings in which it is a party. 56 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.